Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,102
Prescribing practitioner; loss of ability to prescribe; effect on validity of prescription; pharmacist; use professional judgment; applicability.

A prescription that is valid when written remains valid for the period stated in the medical order notwithstanding the prescribing practitioner's subsequent death or retirement or the suspension or revocation of the prescribing practitioner's credential by the appropriate board, and a pharmacist may use professional judgment to fill or refill such a prescription which has sufficient fills remaining. This section shall not apply to a prescription issued by a veterinarian.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 53.